Utah statutes.
59-14-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Brand family" is as defined in Section 59-14-601.

(2)  "Tobacco product manufacturer" is as defined in Section 59-14-601.



Enacted by Chapter 148, 2013 General Session

